fst/lexc/git_misc.txt
Multichar_Symbols
+QUA
+NUM
+PT
-T
-1PL
-2PL
-3PL
-SX

LEXICON Quantifier
+QUA:	QuantificationalInfl;

LEXICON Number
+NUM:	QuantificationalInfl;

LEXICON QuantificationalInfl
	Word ;
	SX ;
    AgreeingNClitic ;
-1PL.II:^'m	Word ;
-2PL.II:^si'm	Word ;
-3PL.II:^diit	Word ;

LEXICON Particle
+PT:	# ;
